Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 2, chapter 560, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Facility” means:
(A) A residential treatment facility;
(B) A residential treatment home;
(C) A secure residential treatment facility; or
(D) A secure residential treatment home.
(b) “Residential treatment facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(c) “Residential treatment home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(d) “Secure residential treatment facility” means a facility described in ORS 443.465.
(e) “Secure residential treatment home” means a home described in ORS 443.465.
(f) “Transition aged youth residential treatment home” means a residential  treatment home for
young adults between the ages of [ 17.5] 17 and 25  years of age who experience complex behavioral
health challenges.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to:
(a) Support facilities in developing early transition plans for residents.
(b) Establish  a separate licensing process for transition aged youth residential treatment homes.
(3) No later  than September 15, 2025, the authority shall submit an interim report, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health,
about the authority’s progress in carrying out the  provisions of this section and any recommenda-
tions for needed legislative changes.
(4) No later than September 15, 2026, the authority shall submit a final  report, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245,  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health,
about the authority’s progress in carrying out the  provisions of this section and any recommenda-
tions for needed legislative changes.
SECTION 2.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4068 (HB 4068-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4068 (HB 4068-INTRO) Page 2